Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-898
Interstate bridges; location studies; agreements with adjoining states; division of costs.

The department shall have the power and authority to enter into agreements with an adjoining state to determine the location of interstate bridges, or the relocation of any part thereof; Provided, that any such agreement shall provide that the costs incurred by the department and the adjoining state in pursuance of the agreement shall be shared equally by the department and the adjoining state.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 8, p. 637.